Washington statutes.
RCW 18.32.800

Opioid drug prescribing rules—Adoption.

(1) By January 1, 2019, the commission must adopt rules establishing requirements for prescribing opioid drugs. The rules may contain exemptions based on education, training, amount of opioids prescribed, patient panel, and practice environment.

(2) In developing the rules, the commission must consider the agency medical directors' group and centers for disease control guidelines, and may consult with the department of health, the University of Washington, and the largest professional association of dentists in the state.

[ 2017 c 297 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2017 c 297: See note following RCW 18.22.800.